Massachusetts, session 194th, H2596.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1:- Section 32 of Chapter 22C is hereby amended by inserting after the words
“or intimidation” the following:-
“, or an attack on a police officer which results in serious injury or death”
of 1